Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 88 Rhode Island After School and Summer Learning Program Act

16-88-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island After School and Summer Learning Program Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 93, § 1.

16-88-2.
Findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that participating in high quality after school and summer learning programs provides children and youth needed resources to succeed in school and in life.

The general assembly also finds that in 2005, seventy-four percent (74%) of children ages six (6) to seventeen (17) in Rhode Island had all parents in the workforce, higher than the U.S. average of sixty-eight percent (68%). On school days, the hours between 3:00 p.m. and 6:00 p.m. are the peak hours for juvenile crime and experimentation with drug, alcohol, cigarettes and sex. Differences in summer learning accounted for sixty-five percent (65%) of the gap in reading scores between upper-income students who went to four (4) year colleges and low-income high-school dropouts. After school programs have been shown to support local schools by providing children and youth with opportunities to engage in hands-on activities that hold students’ interests and develop their skills and a sense of competence.

The general assembly also finds that the need for after school and summer learning programs is demonstrated by the Rhode Island department of education grant competition for after school and summer learning programs funding. In each of the competitions; almost double the money has been requested than was available for funding.

Furthermore, the general assembly finds that there is an existing infrastructure of after school and summer learning programs in Rhode Island serving school age children from kindergarten to 12th grade that is supported through state and federal investments in child care, 21st century community learning centers program, child opportunity zones, community-based organizations and public schools. It is the intent of the general assembly to support a system of publicly-funded, high quality after school and summer learning programs that are operated through a diverse delivery network, including child care, 21st century community learning centers program, child opportunity zones, community-based organizations and public districts.

By enacting this law, the general assembly acknowledges the need to adequately prepare all children to succeed in school and life by providing access to publicly-funded high quality after school and summer learning programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 93, § 1.

16-88-3.
Planning phase for a demonstration afterschool and summer learning program.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall begin planning an initial, demonstration after school and summer learning program that meets high quality standards, is age/grade appropriate, runs programming during the hours of 3:00 p.m. through 6:00 p.m. during the week, promotes the healthy development of youth, connects to the school day, builds on the existing after school and summer learning infrastructure in the state (including child care, 21st century community learning centers program, child opportunity zones, community-based organizations and public schools), incorporates experiential learning, social/emotional development and project-based activities and serves all children and youth from kindergarten to 12th grade with an emphasis on children and youth who attend high poverty, low performing schools. This planning phase will develop specific goals to expand the demonstration after school and summer learning program over time and will also identify opportunities to strengthen learning opportunities for children and youth.

During this planning phase, the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education will: (1) Quantify the resources needed to achieve and maintain high quality standards based on existing quality standards in after school and summer learning programs; (2) Identify incentives and supports to develop a qualified workforce, including opportunities for professional development, planning time and staff development.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education will begin to develop plans to collect and analyze data regarding the impact of the demonstration after school and summer learning program on participating children’s school achievement, behavior during school hours and social/emotional development.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 93, § 1.

16-88-4.
Reporting.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall issue an interim report by February 26, 2010 to the general assembly and the governor and submit a final report on the progress of the demonstration planning phase no later than May 30, 2010.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 93, § 1.